Illinois, session 104th, HB2541.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Statute on Statutes is amended by changing 5Section 1.42 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 70/1.42)7    Sec. 1.42. Developmental disability. 8    (a) Except where the context indicates otherwise, in any 9rule, contract, or other document a reference to a 10developmentally disabled person or a similar reference shall 11be considered a reference to a person with a developmental 12disability and a reference to the developmentally disabled or 13a similar reference shall be considered a reference to persons 14with developmental disabilities.15    (b) Except where the context indicates otherwise, in any 16rule, contract, or other document the term "developmental 17disability" shall include a disability attributable to 18Prader-Willi syndrome. 19    (c) Except where the context indicates otherwise, whenever 20there is a reference in any Act to "development disability" 21this term shall be construed to include a disability 22attributable to Prader-Willi syndrome. 23    (d) The use of either "developmentally disabled" or   HB2541- 2 -LRB104 08083 KTG 18129 b1"developmental disability" or "the developmentally disabled" 2or "persons with developmental disabilities" shall not 3invalidate any rule, contract, or other document.4(Source: P.A. 99-143, eff. 7-27-15.) 5    Section 10. The Mental Health and Developmental 6Disabilities Administrative Act is amended by adding Section 73.5 as follows: 8    (20 ILCS 1705/3.5 new)9    Sec. 3.5. Prader-Willi syndrome. The Department shall 10include Prader-Willi syndrome as a developmental disability in 11any rule defining the term "developmental disability" and in 12any rule listing specific medical conditions or disabilities 13eligible for developmental disability services provided by the 14Department. 15    Section 15. The Mental Health and Developmental 16Disabilities Code is amended by changing Section 1-106 as 17follows: 18    (405 ILCS 5/1-106)  (from Ch. 91 1/2, par. 1-106)19    Sec. 1-106. "Developmental disability" means a severe, 20chronic disability, other than mental illness, found to be 21closely related to an intellectual disability because this 22condition results in impairment of general intellectual   HB2541- 3 -LRB104 08083 KTG 18129 b1functioning or adaptive behavior similar to that of persons 2with ID, and requires services similar to those required for a 3person with an intellectual disability. In addition, a 4developmental disability: (1) is manifested before the 5individual reaches 22 years of age; (2) is likely to continue 6indefinitely; (3) results in substantial functional 7limitations in three or more of the following areas of major 8life activity: self-care, receptive and expressive language, 9learning, mobility, self-direction, capacity for independent 10living, or economic self-sufficiency; and (4) reflects the 11individual's need for a combination and sequence of special 12interdisciplinary or generic services, individualized 13supports, or other forms of assistance that are of lifelong or 14extended duration and are individually planned and 15coordinated. "Developmental disability" includes a disability 16attributable to Prader-Willi syndrome. This definition does 17not supersede the "developmental disability" definition in 18Section 1.1 of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act 19which is required to be applied under that Act for the purpose 20of mandatory reporting.21(Source: P.A. 102-972, eff. 1-1-23.) 22    Section 20. The Developmental Disability and Mental 23Disability Services Act is amended by changing Section 2-3 as 24follows:   HB2541- 4 -LRB104 08083 KTG 18129 b1    (405 ILCS 80/2-3)  (from Ch. 91 1/2, par. 1802-3)2    Sec. 2-3. As used in this Article, unless the context 3requires otherwise: 4    (a) "Agency" means an agency or entity licensed by the 5Department pursuant to this Article or pursuant to the 6Community Residential Alternatives Licensing Act.7    (b) "Department" means the Department of Human Services, 8as successor to the Department of Mental Health and 9Developmental Disabilities.10    (c) "Home-based services" means services provided to an 11adult with a mental disability who lives in his or her own 12home. These services include but are not limited to:13        (1) home health services;14        (2) case management;15        (3) crisis management;16        (4) training and assistance in self-care;17        (5) personal care services;18        (6) habilitation and rehabilitation services;19        (7) employment-related services;20        (8) respite care; and21        (9) other skill training that enables a person to 22    become self-supporting.23    (d) "Legal guardian" means a person appointed by a court 24of competent jurisdiction to exercise certain powers on behalf 25of an adult with a mental disability.26    (e) "Adult with a mental disability" means a person over   HB2541- 5 -LRB104 08083 KTG 18129 b1the age of 18 years who lives in his or her own home; who needs 2home-based services, but does not require 24-hour-a-day 3supervision; and who has one of the following conditions: 4severe autism, severe mental illness, a severe or profound 5intellectual disability, or severe and multiple impairments.6    (f) In one's "own home" means that an adult with a mental 7disability lives alone; or that an adult with a mental 8disability is in full-time residence with his or her parents, 9legal guardian, or other relatives; or that an adult with a 10mental disability is in full-time residence in a setting not 11subject to licensure under the Nursing Home Care Act, the 12Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013, the 13ID/DD Community Care Act, the MC/DD Act, or the Child Care Act 14of 1969, as now or hereafter amended, with 3 or fewer other 15adults unrelated to the adult with a mental disability who do 16not provide home-based services to the adult with a mental 17disability.18    (g) "Parent" means the biological or adoptive parent of an 19adult with a mental disability, or a person licensed as a 20foster parent under the laws of this State who acts as a foster 21parent to an adult with a mental disability.22    (h) "Relative" means any of the following relationships by 23blood, marriage or adoption: parent, son, daughter, brother, 24sister, grandparent, uncle, aunt, nephew, niece, great 25grandparent, great uncle, great aunt, stepbrother, stepsister, 26stepson, stepdaughter, stepparent or first cousin.  HB2541- 6 -LRB104 08083 KTG 18129 b1    (i) "Severe autism" means a lifelong developmental 2disability which is typically manifested before 30 months of 3age and is characterized by severe disturbances in reciprocal 4social interactions; verbal and nonverbal communication and 5imaginative activity; and repertoire of activities and 6interests. A person shall be determined severely autistic, for 7purposes of this Article, if both of the following are 8present:9        (1) Diagnosis consistent with the criteria for 10    autistic disorder in the current edition of the Diagnostic 11    and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders.12        (2) Severe disturbances in reciprocal social 13    interactions; verbal and nonverbal communication and 14    imaginative activity; repertoire of activities and 15    interests. A determination of severe autism shall be based 16    upon a comprehensive, documented assessment with an 17    evaluation by a licensed clinical psychologist or 18    psychiatrist. A determination of severe autism shall not 19    be based solely on behaviors relating to environmental, 20    cultural or economic differences.21    (j) "Severe mental illness" means the manifestation of all 22of the following characteristics:23        (1) A primary diagnosis of one of the major mental 24    disorders in the current edition of the Diagnostic and 25    Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders listed below:26            (A) Schizophrenia disorder.  HB2541- 7 -LRB104 08083 KTG 18129 b1            (B) Delusional disorder.2            (C) Schizo-affective disorder.3            (D) Bipolar affective disorder.4            (E) Atypical psychosis.5            (F) Major depression, recurrent.6        (2) The individual's mental illness must substantially 7    impair his or her functioning in at least 2 of the 8    following areas:9            (A) Self-maintenance.10            (B) Social functioning.11            (C) Activities of community living.12            (D) Work skills.13        (3) Disability must be present or expected to be 14    present for at least one year.15    A determination of severe mental illness shall be based 16upon a comprehensive, documented assessment with an evaluation 17by a licensed clinical psychologist or psychiatrist, and shall 18not be based solely on behaviors relating to environmental, 19cultural or economic differences.20    (k) "Severe or profound intellectual disability" means a 21manifestation of all of the following characteristics:22        (1) A diagnosis which meets Classification in Mental 23    Retardation or criteria in the current edition of the 24    Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders for 25    severe or profound mental retardation (an IQ of 40 or 26    below). This must be measured by a standardized instrument   HB2541- 8 -LRB104 08083 KTG 18129 b1    for general intellectual functioning.2        (2) A severe or profound level of disturbed adaptive 3    behavior. This must be measured by a standardized adaptive 4    behavior scale or informal appraisal by the professional 5    in keeping with illustrations in Classification in Mental 6    Retardation, 1983.7        (3) Disability diagnosed before age of 18.8    A determination of a severe or profound intellectual 9disability shall be based upon a comprehensive, documented 10assessment with an evaluation by a licensed clinical 11psychologist or certified school psychologist or a 12psychiatrist, and shall not be based solely on behaviors 13relating to environmental, cultural or economic differences.14    (l) "Severe and multiple impairments" means the 15manifestation of all of the following characteristics:16        (1) The evaluation determines the presence of a 17    developmental disability which is expected to continue 18    indefinitely, constitutes a substantial disability and is 19    attributable to any of the following:20            (A) Intellectual disability as defined in Section 21        1-116 of the Mental Health and Developmental 22        Disabilities Code.23            (B) Cerebral palsy.24            (C) Epilepsy.25            (D) Autism.26            (E) Prader-Willi syndrome.   HB2541- 9 -LRB104 08083 KTG 18129 b1            (F) (E) Any other condition which results in 2        impairment similar to that caused by an intellectual 3        disability and which requires services similar to 4        those required by persons with intellectual 5        disabilities.6        (2) Except as otherwise provided for persons diagnosed 7    with Prader-Willi syndrome, the The evaluation determines 8    multiple disabilities in physical, sensory, behavioral or 9    cognitive functioning which constitute a severe or 10    profound impairment attributable to one or more of the 11    following:12            (A) Physical functioning, which severely impairs 13        the individual's motor performance that may be due to:14                (i) Neurological, psychological or physical 15            involvement resulting in a variety of disabling 16            conditions such as hemiplegia, quadriplegia or 17            ataxia,18                (ii) Severe organ systems involvement such as 19            congenital heart defect,20                (iii) Physical abnormalities resulting in the 21            individual being non-mobile and non-ambulatory or 22            confined to bed and receiving assistance in 23            transferring, or24                (iv) The need for regular medical or nursing 25            supervision such as gastrostomy care and feeding.26            Assessment of physical functioning must be based   HB2541- 10 -LRB104 08083 KTG 18129 b1        on clinical medical assessment by a physician licensed 2        to practice medicine in all its branches, using the 3        appropriate instruments, techniques and standards of 4        measurement required by the professional.5            (B) Sensory, which involves severe restriction due 6        to hearing or visual impairment limiting the 7        individual's movement and creating dependence in 8        completing most daily activities. Hearing impairment 9        is defined as a loss of 70 decibels aided or speech 10        discrimination of less than 50% aided. Visual 11        impairment is defined as 20/200 corrected in the 12        better eye or a visual field of 20 degrees or less. 13        Sensory functioning must be based on clinical medical 14        assessment by a physician licensed to practice 15        medicine in all its branches using the appropriate 16        instruments, techniques and standards of measurement 17        required by the professional.18            (C) Behavioral, which involves behavior that is 19        maladaptive and presents a danger to self or others, 20        is destructive to property by deliberately breaking, 21        destroying or defacing objects, is disruptive by 22        fighting, or has other socially offensive behaviors in 23        sufficient frequency or severity to seriously limit 24        social integration. Assessment of behavioral 25        functioning may be measured by a standardized scale or 26        informal appraisal by a clinical psychologist or   HB2541- 11 -LRB104 08083 KTG 18129 b1        psychiatrist.2            (D) Cognitive, which involves intellectual 3        functioning at a measured IQ of 70 or below. 4        Assessment of cognitive functioning must be measured 5        by a standardized instrument for general intelligence. 6        Persons diagnosed with Prader-Willi syndrome are 7        exempt from any assessment or evaluation to measure 8        cognitive functioning or IQ for purposes of making a 9        determination of severe and multiple impairments. 10        (3) Except as otherwise provided for persons diagnosed 11    with Prader-Willi syndrome, the The evaluation determines 12    that development is substantially less than expected for 13    the age in cognitive, affective or psychomotor behavior as 14    follows:15            (A) Cognitive, which involves intellectual 16        functioning at a measured IQ of 70 or below. 17        Assessment of cognitive functioning must be measured 18        by a standardized instrument for general intelligence. 19        Persons diagnosed with Prader-Willi syndrome are 20        exempt from any assessment or evaluation to measure 21        cognitive functioning or IQ for purposes of making a 22        determination on whether such persons have severe and 23        multiple impairments. 24            (B) Affective behavior, which involves over and 25        under responding to stimuli in the environment and may 26        be observed in mood, attention to awareness, or in   HB2541- 12 -LRB104 08083 KTG 18129 b1        behaviors such as euphoria, anger or sadness that 2        seriously limit integration into society. Affective 3        behavior must be based on clinical assessment using 4        the appropriate instruments, techniques and standards 5        of measurement required by the professional.6            (C) Psychomotor, which includes a severe 7        developmental delay in fine or gross motor skills so 8        that development in self-care, social interaction, 9        communication or physical activity will be greatly 10        delayed or restricted.11        (4) A determination that the disability originated 12    before the age of 18 years.13    A determination of severe and multiple impairments shall 14be based upon a comprehensive, documented assessment with an 15evaluation by a licensed clinical psychologist or 16psychiatrist. Persons diagnosed with Prader-Willi syndrome are 17exempt from any assessment or evaluation to measure cognitive 18functioning or IQ for purposes of making determinations on 19whether such persons have severe and multiple impairments 20eligible for home-based and community-based services. 2122    If the examiner is a licensed clinical psychologist, 23ancillary evaluation of physical impairment, cerebral palsy or 24epilepsy must be made by a physician licensed to practice 25medicine in all its branches.26    Regardless of the discipline of the examiner, ancillary   HB2541- 13 -LRB104 08083 KTG 18129 b1evaluation of visual impairment must be made by an 2ophthalmologist or a licensed optometrist.3    Regardless of the discipline of the examiner, ancillary 4evaluation of hearing impairment must be made by an 5otolaryngologist or an audiologist with a certificate of 6clinical competency.7    The only exception to the above is in the case of a person 8with cerebral palsy or epilepsy who, according to the 9eligibility criteria listed below, has multiple impairments 10which are only physical and sensory. In such a case, a 11physician licensed to practice medicine in all its branches 12may serve as the examiner.13    (m) "Twenty-four-hour-a-day supervision" means 1424-hour-a-day care by a trained mental health or developmental 15disability professional on an ongoing basis.16(Source: P.A. 102-972, eff. 1-1-23.)